California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(a) Notwithstanding any other law, except as specified in subdivision (b), no student, including a person without lawful immigration status, a person who is exempt from nonresident tuition pursuant to Section 68130.5 of the Education Code, or a person who is both without lawful immigration status and exempt from nonresident tuition pursuant to Section 68130.5 of the Education Code, who meets the requirements for admission to a medical degree program at any public or private postsecondary educational institution that offers that program shall be denied admission to that program based on the student’s citizenship status or immigration status.

(b) Except for students granted status
 pursuant to Section 1101(a)(15)(T) or (U) of Title 8 of the United States Code, this section shall not apply to a person excluded from the term “immigrant,” for purposes of the federal Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. Sec. 1101), pursuant to paragraph (15) of subdivision (a) of Section 1101 of Title 8 of the United States Code, as that paragraph exists on January 1, 2017.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 2.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2064.4.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, except as specified in subdivision (b), no student, including a person without lawful immigration status, a person who is exempt from nonresident tuition pursuant to Section 68130.5 of the Education Code, or a person who is both without lawful immigration status and exempt from nonresident tuition pursuant to Section 68130.5 of the Education Code, who meets the requirements for admission to a healing arts residency training program whose participants are not paid shall be denied admission to that program based on the student’s citizenship status or immigration status.

(b) Except for students granted status pursuant to Section 1101(a)(15)(T) or
 (U) of Title 8 of the United States Code, this section shall not apply to a person excluded from the term “immigrant,” for purposes of the federal Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. Section 1101), pursuant to paragraph (15) of subdivision (a) of Section 1101 of Title 8 of the United States Code, as that paragraph exists on January 1, 2017.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 3.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2064.5.

(a) Within 180 days after beginning a board-approved postgraduate training program pursuant to Section 2065, medical school graduates shall obtain a physician’s and surgeon’s postgraduate training license. To be considered for a postgraduate training license, the applicant shall submit the application forms and primary source documents required by the board, shall successfully pass all required licensing examinations, shall pay a nonrefundable application and processing fee, and shall not have committed any act that would be grounds for denial.

(1) Each application submitted pursuant to this section shall be made upon an online electronic form, or another form provided by the board, and each application form shall contain a legal verification by the applicant
 certifying under penalty of perjury that the information provided by the applicant is true and correct and that any information in supporting documents provided by the applicant is true and correct.

(2) Each application shall include the following:

(A) A diploma issued by a board-approved medical school. The requirements of the school shall not have been less than those required under this chapter at the time the diploma was granted or by any preceding medical practice act at the time that the diploma was granted. In lieu of a diploma, the applicant may submit evidence satisfactory to the board of having possessed the same.

(B) An official transcript or other official evidence satisfactory to the board showing each approved medical school in which a resident course of professional instruction was pursued covering the
 minimum requirements for certification as a physician and surgeon, and that a diploma and degree were granted by the school.

(C) Other information concerning the professional instruction and preliminary education of the applicant as the board may require.

(D) An affidavit showing to the satisfaction of the board that the applicant is the person named in each diploma and transcript that the applicant submits, that the applicant is the lawful holder thereof, and that the diploma or transcript was procured in the regular course of professional instruction and examination without fraud or misrepresentation.

(E) Either fingerprint cards or a copy of a completed Live Scan form from the applicant.

(F) If the medical school graduate graduated from a foreign medical school approved by the board pursuant to Section 2084, an official Educational Commission for Foreign Medical Graduates (ECFMG) Certification Status Report confirming the graduate
 is ECFMG certified.

(b) Any physician’s and surgeon’s postgraduate training license in an active status issued on or after January 1, 2020, shall be valid for a period of 36 months. The physician’s and surgeon’s postgraduate training licensee may engage in the practice of medicine only in connection with the licensee’s duties as an intern or resident physician in a board-approved program, including its affiliated sites, or under those conditions as are approved in writing and maintained in the postgraduate licensee’s file by the director of the program.

(c) The postgraduate training licensee may engage in the practice of medicine in locations authorized by subdivision (b), and as permitted by the Medical Practice Act and other applicable statutes and regulations, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Diagnose and treat patients.

(2) Prescribe medications without a cosigner, including prescriptions for controlled substances, if the licensee has the appropriate Drug Enforcement Agency registration or permit and is registered with the Department of Justice CURES program.

(3) Sign birth certificates without a cosigner.

(4) Sign death certificates without a cosigner.

(5) Sign any other forms a physician and surgeon is authorized to sign.

(d) The postgraduate training licensee may be disciplined by the board at any time for any of the grounds that would subject the holder of a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate to discipline.

(e) If the medical school graduate fails to obtain a postgraduate license within 180 days after beginning a board-approved postgraduate training program or if the board denies the graduate’s application for a postgraduate license, all privileges and exemptions under this section shall automatically cease.

(f) Each medical school graduate who was issued a postgraduate training authorization letter by the board prior to January 1, 2020, and is enrolled in a board-approved postgraduate training program by April 30, 2025, will be issued a postgraduate training license automatically by June 30, 2020, or by June 30 of the year following initial enrollment into a board-approved postgraduate training program, whichever is earlier, upon proof of enrollment in the postgraduate training program.

(g) The board shall confidentially
 destroy the file of each medical school graduate who was issued a postgraduate training authorization letter by the board prior to January 1, 2020, who did not enroll in a postgraduate training program by April 30, 2025.

(h) The Medical Board of California and the Osteopathic Medical Board of California shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice of all applicants for the postgraduate training license, as defined in this section, to determine whether the applicant has a criminal conviction record in this state or in any other jurisdiction, including foreign countries, pursuant to Section 2042. The Department of Justice shall provide a state- and federal-level response in accordance with subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code for the board to determine whether the applicant
 is subject to denial of licensure under the provisions of Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475) and Section 2221.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 113, Sec. 2.   (SB 160)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2064.6.

Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 2064.5, the expiration date for any postgraduate training license that expires after June 1, 2023, and before December 31, 2023, shall be extended to March 31, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 196, Sec. 3.   (SB 143)   Effective September 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2064.7.

(a) The board may deny a postgraduate training license to an applicant guilty of unprofessional conduct or of any cause that would subject a licensee to revocation or suspension of his or her license. The board, in its sole discretion, may issue a probationary postgraduate training license to an applicant subject to terms and conditions, including, but not limited to, any of the following conditions of probation:

(1) Limitations on practice.

(2) Total or partial restrictions on drug prescribing privileges for controlled substances.

(3) Continuing medical or psychiatric treatment.

(4) Ongoing participation in a specified rehabilitation program.

(5) Abstention from the use of alcohol or drugs.

(6) Restrictions against engaging in certain types of medical practice.

(7) Compliance with all provisions of this chapter.

(8) Payment of the cost of probation monitoring.

(b) The decision placing the applicant on probation shall be disclosed to an inquiring member of the public indefinitely and shall be posted on the board’s Internet Web site for the period of probation.

(c) The board may modify or terminate the terms and conditions imposed on the probationary postgraduate training license after one year upon receipt of a petition from the postgraduate training licensee. The board may assign the petition to an administrative law judge designated in Section 11371 of the Government Code. After a hearing on the petition, the administrative law judge shall provide a proposed decision to the board.

(d) The board shall deny a postgraduate training license to an applicant who is required to register pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code. This subdivision does not apply to an applicant who is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code solely because of a misdemeanor conviction under Section 314 of the Penal
 Code.

(e) An applicant shall not be eligible to reapply for a postgraduate training license for a minimum of three years from the effective date of the denial of his or her application, except that the board may, in its discretion and for good cause demonstrated, permit reapplication after not less than one year has elapsed from the effective date of the denial.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 775, Sec. 26.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative January 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2064.8.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 2064.7, the board may issue a postgraduate training license to an applicant who has committed minor violations that the board deems, in its discretion, do not merit the denial of a postgraduate training license or require probationary status under Section 2064.7, and may concurrently issue a public letter of reprimand. The public reprimand may include a requirement that the licensee complete relevant educational courses approved by the board.

(b) A public letter of reprimand issued concurrently with a postgraduate training license shall be purged three years from the date of issuance.

(c) A public letter of reprimand issued pursuant to this section shall be disclosed to an inquiring member of the public and shall be posted on the board’s Internet Web site until purged consistent with this section.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the board’s authority to issue an unrestricted postgraduate training license.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 775, Sec. 27.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative January 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2065.

(a) Unless otherwise provided by law, a postgraduate training licensee, intern, resident, postdoctoral fellow, or instructor shall not engage in the practice of medicine, or receive compensation therefor, or offer to engage in the practice of medicine unless they hold a valid, unrevoked, and unsuspended physician’s and surgeon’s certificate issued by the board. However, a graduate of an approved medical school may engage in the practice of medicine whenever and wherever required as a part of a postgraduate training program under the following conditions:

(1) The medical school graduate has taken and passed the board-approved medical licensing examinations required to qualify the applicant to participate in an approved postgraduate training program.

(2) If the medical school graduate graduated from a foreign medical school approved by the board pursuant to Section 2084, the Educational Commission for Foreign Medical Graduates (ECFMG) has submitted an official ECFMG Certification Status Report directly to the board confirming the graduate is ECFMG certified.

(3) The medical school graduate is enrolled in a postgraduate training program approved by the board.

(4) The board-approved postgraduate training program has submitted the required board-approved form to the board documenting the medical school graduate is enrolled in an approved postgraduate training program.

(5) The medical school graduate obtains a physician’s and surgeon’s postgraduate training license in accordance with Section 2064.5.

(b) A medical school graduate enrolled in an approved postgraduate training program in accordance with this section may engage in the practice of medicine whenever and wherever required as a part of the training program, and may receive compensation for that practice.

(c) A graduate from a medical school approved pursuant to Section 2084 who is engaged in an Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education (ACGME)-accredited postgraduate training program outside of California may, as a participant in guest rotations in an approved postgraduate training program in California or a participating training site affiliated with an ACGME-accredited program, engage in the practice of medicine whenever and wherever required as part of that training program, not to exceed a total of 90 days for all rotations, and may receive compensation for that practice without obtaining a physician’s
 and surgeon’s postgraduate training license in accordance with Section 2064.5.

(d) All approved postgraduate training the medical school graduate has successfully completed in the United States or Canada shall count toward the postgraduate training requirement to obtain a physician’s and surgeon’s license under Section 2096.

(e) The program director for an approved postgraduate training program in California shall report to the board, on a form approved by the board, and provide any supporting documents as required by the board, the following actions within 30 days of the action:

(1) A postgraduate training licensee is notified that they have received partial or no credit for a period of postgraduate training, and their postgraduate training period is extended.

(2) A postgraduate training licensee takes a leave of absence or any break from their postgraduate training, and they are notified that their postgraduate training period is extended.

(3) A postgraduate training licensee is terminated from the postgraduate training program.

(4) A postgraduate training licensee resigns, dies, or otherwise leaves the postgraduate training program.

(5) A postgraduate training licensee has completed a one-year contract approved by the postgraduate training program.

(f) Upon review of supporting documentation, the board, in its discretion, may grant an extension beyond 36 months to a postgraduate training licensee who graduated from a medical school approved by the board pursuant to Section 2084 to receive
 credit for the 12 months of required approved postgraduate training for graduates of medical schools in the United States and Canada and 24 months of required approved postgraduate training for graduates of foreign medical schools other than Canadian medical schools.

(g) An applicant for a physician’s and surgeon’s license who has either graduated from medical school in the United States or Canada and has received 12 months credit of board-approved postgraduate training in another state or in Canada, or has graduated from a foreign medical school approved by the board pursuant to Section 2084 and has received 24 months credit of board-approved postgraduate training and who is accepted into an approved postgraduate training program in California shall obtain their physician’s and surgeon’s license within 180 days after beginning that postgraduate training program or all privileges and exemptions under this section shall automatically cease.

(h) Upon review of supporting documentation, the board, in its discretion, may grant a physician’s and surgeon’s license to an applicant who demonstrates substantial compliance with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 294, Sec. 8.5.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2066.5.

(a) The program authorized by this section shall be known and may be cited as the University of California at Los Angeles David Geffen School of Medicine’s International Medical Graduate Program.

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit a foreign medical graduate from engaging in the practice of medicine when required as part of the program authorized by this section.

(c) There is currently a preresidency training
 program at the University of California, Los Angeles David Geffen School of Medicine, Department of Family Medicine, hereafter referred to as UCLA, for selected international medical graduates (IMGs). Participation in the program authorized by this section shall be at the option of UCLA. This section authorizes those IMGs, through the program authorized by this section, to receive, through the existing program, hands-on clinical instruction. The program, as administered by
 UCLA, shall include all of the following elements:

(1) Each
 program participant shall have done all of the following:

(A) Graduated from a medical school recognized by the Medical Board of California at the time of selection.

(B) Taken and passed the United States Medical Licensing Examination Steps 1 and 2 (Clinical Knowledge and Clinical Science).

(C) Submitted an application and materials to the Educational Commission for Foreign Medical Graduates.

(2) A program participant shall receive all clinical instruction at health care facilities operated by the University of California, Los Angeles, or other approved UCLA-designated teaching sites, which shall be hospitals or clinics with either a signed formal
 affiliation agreement with UCLA or a signed letter of agreement.

(3) Participation of a trainee in clinical instruction offered by the program shall not generally exceed 16 weeks. However, at the discretion of UCLA, an additional eight weeks of clinical instruction may be granted. In no event shall a participant receive more than 24 weeks of clinical instruction under the
 program.

(4) The clinical instruction shall be supervised by licensed physicians on faculty at UCLA or faculty affiliated with UCLA as specified in an approved affiliation agreement between UCLA and the affiliated entity.

(5) The clinical instruction shall be provided pursuant to written affiliation agreements for clinical instruction of trainees established by UCLA.

(6) The supervising faculty shall evaluate each participant on a regular basis and shall document the completion of each aspect of the clinical instruction portion of the program for each participant.

(d) UCLA shall provide the board with the names of the participants in the program on an
 annual basis, or more frequently if necessary to maintain accuracy. Upon a reasonable request of the board, UCLA shall provide additional information such as the courses successfully completed by program participants, the dates of instruction, and other relevant information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 144, Sec. 1.   (AB 2311)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2068.

This chapter shall not be construed to prohibit any person from providing nutritional advice or giving advice concerning proper nutrition. However, this section confers no authority to practice medicine or surgery or to undertake the prevention, treatment, or cure of disease, pain, injury, deformity, or physical or mental conditions or to state that any product might cure any disease, disorder, or condition in violation of any provision of law.

For purposes of this section the terms “providing nutritional advice or giving advice concerning proper nutrition” means the giving of information as to the use and role of food and food ingredients, including dietary supplements.

Any person in commercial practice providing nutritional advice or giving advice concerning proper nutrition shall post in an easily visible and prominent place the following statement in his or her place of business:
 
“NOTICE”
“State law allows any person to provide nutritional advice or give advice concerning proper nutrition—which is the giving of advice as to the role of food and food ingredients, including dietary supplements. This state law does NOT confer authority to practice medicine or to undertake the diagnosis, prevention, treatment, or cure of any disease, pain, deformity, injury, or physical or mental condition and specifically does not authorize any person other than one who is a licensed health practitioner to state that any product might cure any disease, disorder, or condition.” 

The notice required by this section shall not be smaller than 812 inches by 11 inches and shall be legibly printed with lettering no smaller than12 inch in length, except the lettering of the word “NOTICE” shall not be smaller than 1 inch in length.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2069.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, a medical assistant may administer medication only by intradermal, subcutaneous, or intramuscular injections and perform skin tests and additional technical supportive services upon the specific authorization and supervision of a licensed physician and surgeon or a licensed podiatrist. A medical assistant may also perform all these tasks and services upon the specific authorization of a physician assistant, a nurse practitioner, or a certified nurse-midwife.

(2) The supervising physician and surgeon may, at his or her discretion, in consultation with the nurse practitioner, certified nurse-midwife, or physician assistant, provide
 written instructions to be followed by a medical assistant in the performance of tasks or supportive services. These written instructions may provide that the supervisory function for the medical assistant for these tasks or supportive services may be delegated to the nurse practitioner, certified nurse-midwife, or physician assistant within the standardized procedures or protocol, and that tasks may be performed when the supervising physician and surgeon is not onsite, if either of the following apply:

(A) The nurse practitioner or certified nurse-midwife is functioning pursuant to standardized procedures, as defined by Section 2725, or protocol. The standardized procedures or protocol, including instructions for specific authorizations, shall be developed and approved by the supervising physician and surgeon and the nurse
 practitioner or certified nurse-midwife.

(B) The physician assistant is functioning pursuant to regulated services defined in Section 3502, including instructions for specific authorizations, and is approved to do so by the supervising physician and surgeon.

(b) As used in this section and Sections 2070 and 2071, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Medical assistant” means a person who may be unlicensed, who performs basic administrative, clerical, and technical supportive services in compliance with this section and Section 2070 for a licensed physician and surgeon or a licensed podiatrist, or group thereof, for a medical or podiatry corporation, for a physician assistant, a nurse practitioner, or a certified nurse-midwife
 as provided in subdivision (a), or for a health care service plan, who is at least 18 years of age, and who has had at least the minimum amount of hours of appropriate training pursuant to standards established by the board. The medical assistant shall be issued a certificate by the training institution or instructor indicating satisfactory completion of the required training. A copy of the certificate shall be retained as a record by each employer of the medical assistant.

(2) “Specific authorization” means a specific written order prepared by the supervising physician and surgeon or the supervising podiatrist, or the physician assistant, the nurse practitioner, or the certified nurse-midwife as provided in subdivision (a), authorizing the procedures to be performed on a patient, which shall be placed in the patient’s medical record, or a
 standing order prepared by the supervising physician and surgeon or the supervising podiatrist, or the physician assistant, the nurse practitioner, or the certified nurse-midwife as provided in subdivision (a), authorizing the procedures to be performed, the duration of which shall be consistent with accepted medical practice. A notation of the standing order shall be placed on the
 patient’s medical record.

(3) “Supervision” means the supervision of procedures authorized by this section by the following practitioners, within the scope of their respective practices, who shall be physically present in the treatment facility during the performance of those procedures:

(A) A licensed physician and surgeon.

(B) A licensed podiatrist.

(C) A physician assistant, nurse practitioner, or certified nurse-midwife as provided in subdivision (a).

(4) (A) “Technical supportive services” means simple routine medical tasks and procedures that may be safely
 performed by a medical assistant who has limited training and who functions under the supervision of a licensed physician and surgeon or a licensed podiatrist, or a physician assistant, a nurse practitioner, or a certified nurse-midwife as provided in subdivision (a).

(B) Notwithstanding any other law, in a facility licensed by the California State Board of Pharmacy under Section 4180 or 4190, other than a facility operated by the state, “technical supportive services” also includes handing to a patient a prepackaged prescription drug, excluding a controlled substance,
 that is labeled in compliance with Section 4170 and all other applicable state and federal laws and ordered by a licensed physician and surgeon, a licensed podiatrist, a physician assistant, a nurse practitioner, or a certified nurse-midwife in accordance with subdivision (a). In every instance, prior to handing the medication to a patient pursuant to this subparagraph, the
 properly labeled and prepackaged prescription drug shall have the patient’s name affixed to the package and a licensed physician and surgeon, a licensed podiatrist, a physician assistant, a nurse practitioner, or a certified nurse-midwife shall verify that it is the correct medication and dosage for that specific patient and shall provide the appropriate patient consultation regarding use of the drug.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed as authorizing any of the following:

(1) The licensure of medical assistants.

(2) The administration of local anesthetic agents by a medical assistant.

(3) The board to adopt any regulations that violate the prohibitions on diagnosis or treatment in Section 2052.

(4) A medical assistant to perform any clinical laboratory test or examination for which he or she is not authorized by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1200).

(5) A nurse practitioner, certified nurse-midwife, or physician assistant to be a laboratory director of a clinical laboratory, as those terms are defined in paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 1206 and subdivision (a) of Section 1209.

(d) A nurse practitioner, certified nurse-midwife, or physician assistant shall not authorize a medical assistant to perform any clinical laboratory
 test or examination for which the medical assistant is not authorized by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1200). A violation of this subdivision constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, a medical assistant shall not be employed for inpatient care in a licensed general acute care hospital, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 333, Sec. 1.   (AB 1841)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2070.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a medical assistant may perform venipuncture or skin puncture for the purposes of withdrawing blood upon specific authorization and under the supervision of a licensed physician and surgeon or a licensed podiatrist, or a physician assistant, a nurse practitioner, or a nurse-midwife as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 2069, if prior thereto the medical assistant has had at least the minimum amount of hours of appropriate training pursuant to standards established by the Division of Licensing. The medical assistant shall be issued a certificate by the training institution or instructor indicating satisfactory completion of the training required. A copy of the certificate shall be retained as a record by each employer of the medical assistant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 358, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2071.

The board shall adopt and administer regulations that establish standards for technical supportive services that may be performed by a medical assistant. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the board from amending or repealing regulations covering medical assistants. The board shall, prior to the adoption of any regulations, request recommendations regarding these standards from appropriate public agencies, including, but not limited to, the California State Board of Optometry, the Board of Registered Nursing, the Board of Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians, the Laboratory Field Services division of the State Department of Public Health, those divisions of the State Department of Education that pertain to private postsecondary
 education and career and vocational preparation, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, the Physician Assistant Examining Committee, and the Physical Therapy Board of California. The board shall also request recommendations regarding these standards from associations of medical assistants, physicians and surgeons, nurses, doctors of podiatric medicine, physician assistants, physical therapists, laboratory technologists, optometrists, and others as the board finds appropriate, including, but not limited to, the California Optometric Association, the California Nurses Association, the California Medical Association, the California Society of Medical Assistants, the California Medical Assistants Association, and the California Physical Therapy Association. Nothing in this section shall be construed to supersede or modify that portion of the Administrative
 Procedure Act that relates to the procedure for the adoption of regulations and which is set forth in Article 5 (commencing with Section 11346) of Chapter 3.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 16.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2074.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the employment of a licensed physician and surgeon practicing in the specialty of ophthalmology by an optometrist licensed under the provisions of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 3000) or by an optometric corporation certificated under that chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2075.

The performance of acupuncture by a certified acupuncturist or other licentiate legally authorized to practice acupuncture within his or her scope of practice or a person licensed or certified in another state to perform acupuncture or other forms of traditional Asian medicine, alone or in conjunction with other forms of traditional Asian medicine, when carried on in a program affiliated with and under the jurisdiction of an approved medical school or approved acupuncture school, for the primary purpose of scientific investigation of acupuncture, shall not be in violation of this chapter, but those procedures shall be carried on only under the supervision of a licensed physician and surgeon.

Any medical school or approved acupuncture school conducting research into acupuncture under this section shall report to the Legislature annually on the fifth legislative day of the regular session of the Legislature concerning the results of that research, the suitability of acupuncture as a therapeutic technique, and performance standards for persons who perform acupuncture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 649, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

2076.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a physician and surgeon who is licensed to practice medicine in another state or country shall be exempt from licensure requirements under this act while practicing medicine in this state if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The physician and surgeon has an oral or written agreement with a sports team to provide general or emergency medical care to the team members, coaching staff, and families traveling with the team for a specific sporting event to take place in this state.

(2) Except as provided in Section 2058 or 2060, the physician and surgeon may not provide care or consultation to any person residing in this state, other than a person described in paragraph (1).

(b) The exemption shall remain in force while the physician and surgeon is traveling with the team, but shall be no longer than 10 days per individual sporting event.

(c) The executive director may grant a physician and surgeon additional time for exemption, up to 20 additional days per sporting event, upon prior request by the physician and surgeon. The total number of days a physician may be exempt, including additional time granted upon request, may not exceed 30 days per sporting event.

(d) A physician and surgeon who is exempt from licensure requirements under this section is not authorized to practice medicine at a health care clinic or facility, including an acute care facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 78, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2076.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a physician and surgeon lawfully practicing medicine in another state or country may be exempted from licensure while practicing medicine in this state under the following conditions:

(1) The physician and surgeon has been invited by the United States Olympic Committee to provide medical services at training sites designated by the olympic training center or to provide medical services at an event in this state sanctioned by the committee.

(2) The United States Olympic Committee certifies to the board the name of the physician and surgeon, the state or country of the applicant’s licensure, and the dates within which the applicant has been invited to provide medical services.

(3) The physician and surgeon’s practice is limited to that required by the United States Olympic Committee. Those medical services shall be within the area of the physician’s and surgeon’s competence and shall only be provided to athletes or team personnel registered to train at the olympic training center or registered to compete in an event conducted under the sanction of the United States Olympic Committee.

(b) The exemption provided in this section shall remain in force while the holder is providing medical services at the invitation of the United States Olympic Committee and only during the time certified to the board, but in no event longer than 90 days.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the official team manager who is responsible for any team member participating in events at the invitation of the United States Olympic Committee in California may give consent to the furnishing of hospital, medical, and surgical care to a minor who is a team member and that consent shall not be subject to disaffirmance because of minority. The consent of the parent, or parents, of that person shall not be necessary in order to authorize hospital, medical, and surgical care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 654, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2077.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a physician and surgeon may delegate various orthopaedic medical tasks to individuals who have completed training as orthopaedic physician assistants and who are working under the supervision and direction of a physician and surgeon. Those assistants who perform only those tasks which may under existing law be so delegated shall not be required to be licensed as physician assistants under Chapter 7.7 (commencing with Section 3500).

(b) As used in this section, “orthopaedic physician assistant” means an individual who meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Successful completion of training as an orthopaedic physician assistant from an approved California orthopaedic physician assistant’s program in any year between 1971 and 1974, inclusive. As used in this section, “approved California orthopaedic physician assistant’s program” means an orthopaedic physician assistant’s course of training that has been accredited by the American Medical Association Council on Medical Education.

(2) Continuous experience as an orthopaedic physician assistant upon completion of the program described in paragraph (1), which may include experience in the United States Armed Services.

(3) Successful fulfillment of the certification requirements of the National Board for Certification of Orthopaedic Physician Assistants.

(c) Nothing in this section shall authorize any individual to hold himself or herself out as a licensed physician assistant in violation of Section 3503.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1030, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2078.

(a) As used in this section, “DMSO” means dimethyl sulfoxide.

(b) A licensed physician and surgeon shall, prior to treating a patient with a DMSO preparation, inform the patient in writing if DMSO has not been approved as a treatment or cure by the Food and Drug Administration for the disorder for which it is being prescribed.
